The more two characters agree, the harder they are to write.

This is not a book about writing wholly antagonistic characters. This book is about a principle that scientists have discovered: That most problems between two people are fundamentally unsolvable and will persist over the length of the relationship.

Two people can still love one another, despite the differences that they cannot change, but it is a fantasy that we can agree on everything that matters.

This is a key for storytellers.

We have known for some time that when two characters agree, one of them is likely unnecessary, but now it is clear that the disagreement, the conflict, is not a hamfisted trope of storytelling, but something fundamental about the human experience.

No matter who we love and admire, we also wish they would change.

That wish, however ill-advised, means that your beloved characters will eventually fight. In that fight they will define themselves. Some people are conflict-hungry, but most are conflict-averse; if we are at the point where we are fighting someone, it means we’ve found the line we cannot let them cross. And this line will be different for each of your characters.

That’s why I recommend writing them fighting: first.

Maybe you’ve already started your story. That’s fine. Write the fight; now. The sooner you see your characters fighting with each other, the sooner you will know what most matters to that character’s life, and it won’t be the same thing as any other character.

When you know what a character cares about, that no one else cares about, you have that character’s main motivation for everything they do. Every step of their life will be in service of the things they cannot compromise on.

We are each the center of a world that makes sense to us and us alone.

The CLASH of two characters will prove they each live in a world that is alien to the other, and the story will be full of original moments between your specific characters, trying desperately to reconcile their population of one. We are all desperate to have someone validate that we are right. No one goes out into the world saying, “I hope I get sucked into someone else’s drama and it overwrites my own agency.” We are a planet of billions of city-states trying to vie for the resources we need to build the vision of life we think is the right one.

Characters will agree on many topics, and on plenty of other topics they will be willing to cave or compromise.

Seduction, Negotiation, Fight
Director Mike Nichols declared that there are only three types of scenes, Seductions, Negotiations, and Fights. And that it’s our job to figure out what type of scene this is, and play it accordingly. I’ve looked but he left no further clues on how he defined those three scenes, but this is how I use them.

Some things we are willing to cave on.

Some things we are willing to compromise on.

Some things are inalienable and we will clash, and fight to the death for them.

A seduction scene, is an attempt to get someone to cave on a topic. The end result of a seduction is the removal of divisions; an alliance.

A negotiation scene, is an attempt to get what we need, while making concessions to the other side. The end result of a negotiation is both sides getting some of what they want, at more cost than they wanted to pay. 

A fight scene, is to the death (metaphorically or literally). Fights don’t end, they stop. Fights happen because one or more of the characters is fundamentally unable to change their view, it is principle to them, axiom, something they have built their lives on top of. “A man convinced against his will, is of the same opinion still.” Fights conclude with the character’s convictions sharpened, or dulled, but the nature of fights is that they are irreconcilable. If a disagreement can be reconciled, it is not a fight, it is a negotiation.

Fights are the key scene in storytelling. You don’t have to write a canonical fight to get the benefits of writing them fighting. But the sooner you know the “doomsday option” that each character is harboring, the easier it is to generate every other scene in your story.

They’re trying not to use the doomsday option.

Even those who are invigorated by fighting with others tend to have some sense that if they hit their counterpart hardest, the fight is likely to stop then and there.

We have an innate sense that if we are to get what we want, we must use as much seduction and negotiation as possible, because fights will not resolve.

Once a conflict has risen to the level of a fight, there is often no going back. We attack. We damage. This is a topic that matters to us, or we wouldn’t be fighting at all, so we defend it vigorously.

Because most of us do not want to damage our relationships beyond repair, we spend our lives trying to get what we want, without getting into a fight that draws blood (whether real or metaphorical blood).
Doomsday
In the intro to this book I said that scientists have discovered that most problems between two people are a permanent feature that they’ll have to deal with.

Specifically I was referring to Julie Schwartz Gottman, PhD. and John Gottman, PhD.

These are not two people with some notions about how a relationship works or falls apart. They figured out how to apply the scientific method to divorce. After bringing in thousands of couples to what the media deemed their ‘Love Lab,’ they can tell you with startling accuracy, if a couple will divorce, or if the couple will stay together and hate it, or if the couple will stay together and love one another.

They systematically studied what they call, the ‘Masters,’ and the ‘Disasters,’ of love. 

The Gottmans studied the beneficial actions couples take, and the damaging actions we can inflict on one another. From time to time, we’re all guilty of the damaging behavior that the ‘Disaster’ couples partook in, but the ‘Masters,’ instinctively avoided or softened their use of the most damaging attacks we can make on one another, and/or the ‘Masters’ of love were able to repair the damage once it had been done.

The four most damaging behaviors they caution us to avoid, they refer to as the Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse:

Criticism
Defensiveness
Stonewalling (or shutting down)
Contempt

Contempt, they say, is the most damaging on the list.

Criticism picks at not just a person’s actions, but ties those actions to a stereotype of behavior that we ascribe to the whole person. “Oh he didn’t pick up the dishes, he doesn’t care about the cleanliness of our house, he’s such a slob.”

Contempt goes beyond criticism, and adds an elevated position for the accuser, and a shameful, diminished position for the target. “He’s such a slob,” becomes, “I’m such a better person than he is because what kind of monster would inflict such mess onto the world.”

As a person, it is useful to avoid contempt for another person.

As a writer, it is useful to find where that contempt lives, and get it onto the page -even if you don’t use such a scene in your final draft.

When you figure out what the contempt moment is for a character, it goes beyond “I’m right and you’re wrong,” and it moves into, “You are bad/deficient/living life wrong, and here’s why.”

Every character’s endgame will be different. Nobody picks the same hill to die on.

Once you know a character’s endgame, you know the doomsday option that they are trying desperately not to use, and it will inform every other interaction they have.
A Note on Unconditional Love
I operate from the principle in Gunnar Rorhbacher’s Comedy Code: A comedy pushes the bonds of friendship as far as those bonds can go without breaking; drama breaks the bonds.

The process in this book can be used to create dramas where characters fight so hard that they use their doomsday option. Those characters will break away in a permanent (or semi-permanent) fashion from other characters. But that is not my style, so most implications in this book will be for a story where the characters work through and manage to stay in each other’s lives, despite their differences.

I don’t mind introducing characters into the story who who have broken away from members of the cast. A tale of them rebuilding and entering back into each other’s lives, is worth my while. But watching the actual moment of two characters ripping apart, for good, hurts me as an audience member, so you won’t see that type of scene in my examples.


Never Stupid: Only Underprepared
While we’re on Rorhbacher’s Comedy Code, another principle of his that we’re going to use in this book is: Never write characters doing something ‘stupid.’

Comedy Code is a book about comedic archetypes and it’s part of how I came up with the characters for the story you’ll see edited in this text. One of the archetypes even seems like it would be built around stupidity: the buffoon.

Buffoons, Rorhbacher argues, are not stupid, they’re overreaching and underprepared. We hate watching characters make stupid decisions that we know we would never make, but we’ll gladly watch someone make a fool out of themselves if instead they make a zealous, overreaching attempt at something only to realize part way through that they are not ready.

Beyond affecting the quality of the work, writing characters making ‘stupid’ choices can halt the writing process. Once a character does something that’s stupid, something not motivated by their worldview, what now? We can write anything if we’re not adhering to consistency of the logic of the story.

Stories are like Sudoku: as boxes of a Sudoku get filled in, the number of possible solutions goes down, until the puzzle resolves into only one possible solution.

Solve your story like a Sudoku. Pay attention to the decisions and attitudes you know the characters have. Be rigorous about what you know to be true. Notice that each character’s worldview prevents them from taking -not just some actions- but most actions. Characters will reject options that do not align with their idea of:

What they think life is about
What they think is the smart way to get those things.

The narrowness of their worldview will result in folly in some circumstances. The more they are overreaching and/or underprepared determines their success rate.

A character of any archetype can mis-judge the severity of the challenge they are facing, not just fools and buffoons.

So long as the character picked what can be argued is the best possible solution to their situation (given the information they had at the time) the character will be driven not by hijinks but by a believable survival instinct that we all use to guide our own lives. The comedic moment (or dramatic, if the result breaks a bond between characters) comes from the difference between the character’s expected reality, and the actual reality that ensues.

Characters always pick THE BEST option for themselves (based on the information they have).

Stick to that principle, and you will find characters present a consistency that you can rely on to always know what they’d do in your scene to survive. Then your work becomes creatively adding obstacles and/or removing strengths the characters want to rely on, so that the character’s best option gives the result that your story needs. 

This is not a suggestion for characters to sidestep every inciting incident. Merely that for each inciting incident, they will do everything they can to kick that inciting incident’s ass, so if we want them to not-succeed, it’s our job to figure out what circumstances will bring about the failure of result. Characters never fail to pick their best option -that’s not up to us- our input is on whether we want their result to fail or not. 

If you’ve played tabletop roleplaying (the most famous of these games is Dungeons and Dragons), the game master running the story never picks, for the players, what they will do, the players get to pick what they do; the game master is there to adjudicate whether the player succeeds or fails at what they want to do.

As writers, we have the same relationship to our characters:

Our characters decide from the options they can perceive. Our characters pick the best option according to their list of priorities, and their preferred strategies. Because that’s what we do as humans: we pick the best option (according to our strategies) and we go after whatever makes the most sense to us at that time.

This doesn’t mean perfect action, or inhuman mettle.

If I choose to eat healthy, I go to the freezer to get the spinach. THERE IS ICE CREAM IN THE FREEZER. The ice cream is an opposing force. The ice cream is an inciting incident.

My choice was to eat healthy. That’s my preference. But on the way to carrying out my plan, I am waylaid by possible dessert. Whether I have the ice cream, or stick to the plan, the plan remains the same: the spinach is what I want myself to eat.

Use consistent logic and let your characters take the best option. Then: interrupt them.

Characters do not sit idly by when they are interrupted from their plans. They might not succeed at thwarting the interruption, but characters strike back against the things that stand in the way of their plans.
Counterattacks
This principle comes from a combination of Story Grid, who proposed this advice, and from Storybrand who gave the term ‘counterattack.’

Your main character does not throw the first punch, but they may throw the last punch.

Heap problems onto your main character, and the story will propel forward. 

Once you know what your characters want, how they go about getting it, and what they’ll do if left with no option to get it, and once you’ve agreed to let them pick their best option at all times, your job becomes crafting challenges that evoke the character, based on their parameters.

Many of us know the term ‘inciting incident’ from English classes, but Story Grid suggests that there are near-endless inciting events that fall onto our characters if we want them to keep moving through the story.

The Stoics believed that if a man is given no obstacles, he will become a weaker man than the one who was forced to find away around or through some challenge. They counseled that we should see our circumstances as something that can forge us into someone much stronger, and that we should not envy the lives of those we see as easier to our own. 

A character who has it easy, can be loved by the audience, but it’s much harder to write. (With the exception of the slice-of-life cozy genre that seems to be emerging, where the point of the genre is to get what you want with minimal opposition.)

A character who has been through punishing trials and loses in the end, may be loved by a niche audience who wants something other than happily ever after.

But a character who has been through harrowing trials, and keeps getting back up, and metaphorically throws the final punch, can be beloved by the audience for being brave.

A character who tries and fails can still instill bravery in some audience members who appreciate the real-life aspect of the story. But bravery in the ‘fantasy of storytelling’ sense, that makes people fall in love with the character, is generally the happily ever after result of a character not-giving-up.

Characters cannot not-give-up, if we don’t offer them plenty of reasons to quit their quest, and exits they refuse to take.

Bravery, story bravery, comes from watching characters get knocked down and get back up. 

So pile on the challenges or else it won’t seem like they didn’t-quit, it’ll just seem like they didn’t have to quit, because it was easy for them.

To win bonus points from your audience, in addition to them always choosing the best option they have available in any given circumstances, give them a juicy Life Boat, so that they are choosing the best option OVER an easier option that won’t give them what they want, but will put their comfort-blanket back.
All Is Lost, Dark Night of the Soul, Capitulation to Death
If you keep heaping trouble onto your characters, eventually, there will come a breaking point where it seems as if there are no good options left, just the lesser of two pointless evils.

This moment is sometimes called the Dark Night of the Soul, sometimes called the All Is Lost Moment.

I like how it’s described in the non-fiction book “How the Mighty Fall” about the decision great companies have to make when they are about to go under. Companies that were once-great, who have messed up big time, have the choice to “capitulate to death,” or remember what their business means to the world.

Chicago is one of the world renowned cities of the USA. 

In 1871, it caught fire. LIke, whole parts of the city.

Most places that caught fire in the 1800s are lost to all but historians: why does Chicago still exist?

Chicago would likely have dispersed as a cultural hub and commerce center after the fire, as the damage was extensive enough to stop every hope the city had of getting back on its feet.

But Chicago didn’t get itself back on its feet, Chicago was helped back onto its feet by the surrounding areas.

Altruism? In the 1800s??

No. Railroads.

Chicago was an important port and rail hub and “anchor store” for the region.

If you’re not familiar with the concept of an anchor store, it’s part of strip-mall economics. In car-dependent suburbs, there is no such thing as foot traffic for most businesses, which means most stores have no way of getting incidental business and have to rely completely on customers who intentionally seek out the items in their store. Unless there is an “anchor store” in the strip-mall. This is a store, usually a chain store, that has reliable goods and an unbeatable variety of them, so people make the drive to go to that store, and then while they’re there they foot-traffic to the other stores in the strip-mall.

If Chicago went down, the entire midwest of the USA would go down with it. All the surrounding cities in multiple states relied on Chicago to bring people and goods into the region.

So the surrounding cities and states paid to have Chicago rebuilt, because “and also Chicago will exist” was an unspoken part of their business plans that they could not live without.

Dark Night of the Soul is about this moment.

If we’ve written a story about a character who is no-one’s Chicago, then we’re gonna have a hard time writing this moment.

But if we’ve created a web of interrelation between our main character and all the supporting cast, and with the greater forces within the main character’s world at-large, then of course they have to get back up: They’re Chicago… What will people do without them?

This is the choice in “How the Mighty Fall,” that saves once-great companies from extinction.

Capitulation to Death has to sound really really good to the main character. The more work it would take to “rebuild Chicago,” the more heroic this moment will be. The easier the ‘Last Lifeboat’ would be to take, the more heroic this moment will be.

Build a story where you heap trouble onto your characters, until Chicago burns down, and give them a Last Lifeboat, and have them commit to their least-bad option, instead of giving up and running away, and your audiences will love that character. We love that heroism.
First Act Fights, to Get Your Story Going
James Scott Bell teaches that the easiest place to hide exposition is within a fight. For our purposes, we’ll let that include a seduction, and a negotiation as well.

The idea is that it’s harder for an audience member to “see the seams” of an info-dump, if that same info is being used as a tool by a character in the scene to get what they want.

So that you get to see a whole example, we’re going to use a simple sci-fi disaster story throughout this book, to show how each principle is used.

To simulate editing a client’s story, I tried to direct an AI to write a novel we can correct. It did so poorly, that what you’ll see is excerpted from my first attempt at rewriting and restructuring the mess it made.

The story was about a terraforming team working to make another planet viable for human life, when a disaster diverts their plans.

Here is some of the info that has to get into the audience’s head, so that they don’t mistakenly set the story in the wrong location, with the wrong stakes:

This is not Earth
This is sci-fi, not magic
There is no interstellar war that they’re fighting; these are civilians
The level of technology is low (no laser guns or teleportation)
Many of the characters are related to one another through blood or marriage
The characters are already aware of the strange biology that will cause the horror
But they think they’re safe
There is a recent delay in shipping in resources from their home planet
Corners are being cut
That includes some safeguards
The main character is a screwup who is determined to finish his work on a terraforming robot
Because of the supply shortage, he does not have what he needs
Most of the characters are specialists who keep to their own isolated departments
The main character, driven by his own need to complete his robot, goes from department to department looking for unused resources he can use to barter his way to the parts he’s missing.
The biological disaster will be present in many different departments, in subtle ways
The only person who can put together that something dangerous is happening is the main character, because no one else is visiting multiple departments

This is a lot of information to get into the minds of the audience member.

When the audience member has all this information, they can make meaning out of the scenes.

When we understand what’s at stake, and who the players are, and what opposes the main characters, it becomes clearer, scene by scene, weather our heroes are winning or losing.

There are several different plot shapes that the story can take, and we vary on which type of story we like to see. Some of us need a happily ever after. Some of us need pyrrhic victory or the story feels fake. Some need to see the characters fail; ancient Greek theatre tradition was about getting the populace together once a year to collectively experience the catharsis of tragedy, together. 

The shape of the plot has to do with personal preference, and what we’re in the mood for.

The one thing any of us rarely forgive, is if the story failed to give us enough information to track what shape we’ve got in the story we’re being told.

Examples: Missing the Information
Using the terraforming story example, if we miss the fact that they’re not on Earth, it would seem silly that they don’t just abandon their research center and evacuate, once things start going wrong. Get that information into the audience’s mind, and they can track that the characters have nowhere to run to because this is not yet a viable planet, so we are engaged watching how they’re going to whether this storm; they can hide, but they cannot run.

Or if we don’t understand that the main character is driven like a mad scientist, to get the components for his robot, then his trek around the station seems arbitrary. Get that information into the audience’s mind, and they can track that he is not moving arbitrarily, but that he is on a clear mission, picking the lowest hanging fruit available to him, and he keeps getting faced with new obstacles at every turn.

If we miss the information about the supply shortage, we might still make sense of the mad scientist going from department to department; his fervor might carry those scenes alone-- but what about the overall plot, where the biological disaster is creeping into each department in unique ways? If you know there's a supply shortage, and that the crew has been cutting corners which has led to rollbacks of safety redundancies, then the disaster feels like a direct result of their hubris, and the impending doom has meaning that wouldn’t be possible, if the characters were prim and proper and kept everything in their place. There may be some virtue to a story of characters who did everything right and still failed… but it’s way harder to write than a story about flawed characters bringing about their own demise. After all: What is a disaster story, without a scientist complaining that there is potential for danger if we don’t act proactively before it’s too late?

Examples: Bad Infodump
I’ll write up some classic infodump versions of these three pieces of information:
Not on Earth
Driven to Build Robot
Supply Shortage
Not on Earth: Infodump
The mad scientist, Zenith, goes to the station’s quartermaster.

Zenith wants some macguffin part for his robot.

The inclusion of ‘robot’ used to clue people into the genre being sci-fi, but the terraforming storyline itself was written with the aid of an AI, so that we could simulate a bad story that needs work; we live in sci-fi lite times.

	Zenith walked up to the quartermaster, she was wearing the standard uniform of their entire terraforming crew, a gray jumpsuit that was easy to clean in what passed for a washing machine in the tin can they called home.

	“I need these two macguffin parts for my robot,” he said, knowing that she was the only place to get supplies on this rock they called a planet.

	“No,” the quartermaster replied curtly. She had given Zenith far too many resources already.

	“That’s it?” Zenith pleaded.

	The quartermaster shrugged, “No… way in hell? If that makes you feel any better?”

	Zenith sulked away. Where was he going to get the parts now? It’s not like he could have them shipped in from off planet in time. Oh, if only he had arrived a generation later, when the terraforming project had built a second outpost that he could pilfer from.

So we get the word planet in there, we get the concept of the “tin can” they live in, and we get in the information about this terraforming project being at the beginning stage. Plenty of early writers will feel proud of a line like “No… way in hell? If that makes you feel any better?” but the line actually violates a principle of storytelling, which is that a definitive position will not be easy to riff off of. The quartermaster said no. Nothing much else to do but go elsewhere.

Driven to Build Robot: Infodump
Mentioning the robot is not enough. During the brainstorming session the AI came up with… sigh… a “Terraforming Tournament” that Zenith is trying to complete his entry for. As dumb as the name is, it was based on some worthy parameters I fed the AI, about making Zenith driven to close an old wound where his mom was often scraping by to keep the family fed, and Zenith is trying to seek fame and fortune.

“The Terraforming Tournament,” is a stupid name, but if the audience doesn’t know about it at all, that’s worse.

The fact that Zenith’s robot is an entry in a contest is relevant information. Contests have deadlines. Contests have contestants. Zenith doesn’t just need any old components, he needs the components that will let him win. And bonus points if we can drip in some of the backstory of the motivation without lathering it on.

	Zenith sulked back to his lab. He flicked on the lightswitch and looked at the boxy shape under the tarpaulin. He pulled the cloth off of Valence, his robot, his dream, his entry for the contest. Well, Valence wouldn’t be his entry for the contest if he didn’t find those macguffins; no one wins with a half-powered robot that doesn’t do anything.

	With the drapery removed, Valence sensed his creator and sprang to life- as much life as his macguffin-less chassis would allow.

	“Zenith! Welcome back. Were you able to procure my macguffins from the quartermaster?” Valence’s voice was light and cheerful. The robot’s optimism crushed Zenith’s spirit all the more.
	
	“No, Valence. The quartermaster wouldn’t even hear me out.”

	“But Zenith, without those macguffins, I will still be incomplete at the time the Terraforming Tournament begins!” Valence’s voice had a shred of concern, but without the disappointment that an organic being might have felt.

	Zenith lost his temper, “Don’t you think I know that! Don’t you think I know how important those macguffins were! If I can’t enter you into the tournament, I’ll die in obscurity! Slowly rotting away on this backwater third-rate terraforming colony!”

Some writers will think that this scene is a success, because a character is showing strong emotion, and even manages to fit the exposition into his outburst. The problem is, nothing happens in this scene. In a way, this scene has less action than the scene with the quartermaster, because Zenith’s robot, Valence, does not disagree with Zenith. If Valence agrees with Zenith, the scene goes limp, because it exists to, at best, make us feel sorry for the protagonist, as we watch him not know what to do.
Supply Shortage: Infodump
This scene, set later, is meant to inform the audience of the secondary effects of the supply shortage, without the audience seeing that it’s a plot point for later. We don’t just need to know that there's a reason Zenith isn’t rife with supplies for his robot. A disaster or horror genre story relies on characters’ hubris and sloth.

Sloth, a deadly sin, is at the heart of many of our problems. In many cases it’s not truly our fault, we live in a society where the rich have no intention of lifting everyone up, so the majority of us are left behind to make do with what we have left.

Gallup did a study of the things that matter most to people at their jobs. The two most important things they found were, 1. Relationship to my direct report, and 2. Was I given the tools I need to do a good job?

In many cases, neglect is a function of not being given the tools we need to do a good job, compounded with a poor relationship with our direct report who will not do anything to remedy the situation.

That’s what we need in the audience’s head, if they are to experience the tragedy of the impending biological disaster, and not simply the melodrama of it.

In ancient Greek storytelling, tragedy is the fall of a good and great person, someone who deserves our admiration, but then squanders it foolishly. Melodrama is the story of the rest of us, as we try to navigate our lives. Melodrama has its place, but the shape of this story is tragedy. The audience needs to be able to see things “shaping up into a tragedy,” as they watch, even if they wouldn’t use those words themselves.

	Zenith’s communicator chirped. Meridian. The station chief.

	“Hello Aunt Meridian, to what do I owe the pleasure?”

	“Zenith, is it true that you have been going around the station bothering everyone?”

	“Yes, Aunt Meridian, but it’s a good thing I had! I found out that Safety Protocol 1 has been breached, due to the supply shortage!”

	“Safety Protocol 1, that’s an important safety protocol,” Meridian paused to think, “I’d better come down there and check things out…”

	“Wonderful, Aunt Meridian, that’s just who should look into things!” Zenith closed his communicator and… 

-And did some other stuff, because this is a limp scene that goes nowhere.
Examples: Hiding the Information in a Fight, Negotiation, or Seduction
Those scenes are not bad for a first draft. While writing them, I was reminded of years’ worth of attempts at getting my stories on the page.

The problem is: they’re short. 148 words, 196 words, 92 words.

An astute reader will notice that since I am making the point that the fight method is great, it is to my advantage to create weakling scenes so that my method can produce more robust results. I have no defense: that is true. I want to show you scenes that look like beginner writing, so that I can show you what this method can do instead, so that you’ll adopt the method, have success with it, and tell everyone you know.

But I also ended those scenes where I did because without creating a conflict in the scene, I genuinely do not know how to keep them going. I wrote as much as I could, and then stopped. And simply, I didn’t get much written before I was stumped on where to go further in the scene.

Word count isn’t the only metric to care about for your story. And to paraphrase adman Rory Sutherland, many of the things that make life worth living are difficult to measure, and so we over-optimize for the things which are easy to measure.

The charm, for example, of a story, is far more important than the word count. Who wants to read an uncharming book, just because it’s hundreds of pages?

But to borrow a principle from weightloss, if you don’t see measurable progress, it’s harder to keep putting in the effort.

If we can get your word counts up, there's no guarantee it’ll lead to a best seller that you’re proud of, but if we never get your word counts up, it’s challenging to keep finding the motivation to write when our efforts yield a few hundred words at a time. Using the assumption of roughly 250 words per page, 148 + 196 + 92 = 436 words, when divided by 250 comes out to 1.744 pages. 1¾ pages.

That’s rough.

Let’s make ‘em fight. See what we get.
Preexisting Relationships: They’ve Already Been Fighting
Author’s note:
To the uninitiated reader, this next section may look like I’m using this non-fiction book as an excuse to tell you about a fiction story I wrote that I spent hundreds of hours on, and I’m blindly in love with. So it’s necessary for me to make a claim that perhaps not all of you will believe:

This is Day 4 of me actively working on this story.

8 days ago, I worked with an AI to build an outline according to all the story writing knowledge I could give to it. That day it wrote a quarter of a novel. The first quarter was not awful, as it was just introducing the characters and the setup anyway.

I went to sleep thinking this was going to work, that while AI can’t write a good book, they could be used to write a mediocre, good-enough book that I could edit as an example case study that didn’t hurt any real-writer’s feelings. Day 2, I had the AI write the rest of the book. It was a vague mess. It contained all the moments you’d expect from a story, except for a clear understanding, at all, of what thing threatened the characters, how they dispatched it, and even if they dispatched it. I gave up for the night.

Day 3, the details of the story nagged at me.
The AI did a bad job of utilizing the characters when it tried to write the story. That’s why, the examples in this book that you’re seeing are written by me, a human (even the examples of what not to do). Human writers are still very important for storytelling, because at present the AI write stories that show that they’ve never lived a day in a human life.

On a day where I’m feeling feisty, I would say there there is no such thing as a story, only our stories. This is a similar philosophical wedge to, “If a tree falls in the woods and no one is around to hear it, does it make a sound?” We tell our stories, carefully camouflaged into a fiction that lets us explore sharper contrasts of life, but the stories are from our own lives.

The AI wrote a bunch of happenstance, in its 30+ pages of nonsense, based on the outline I gave it. I almost scrapped the whole project it was so useless and bad.

On Day 3, after I’d given up on this project, I remembered: when something is that bad, it’s usually useful for bouncing off of, because we humans, we love to tell people why they’re wrong.

Throughout that day, dozens of changes flooded my brain, and as this was not a client’s book, just an AI’s book, there were no feelings or ego to consider, and I smashed the story’s makeup left and right, until it resembled a cast and scenario I was happy with.

This is Day 4. 

On Day 3, once I made all the following changes to the cast and the scenario, I left the story alone for about a week, and let it sink into my head. I do not have the document open as I write this non-fiction book, this is from memory.

Once the characters were interrelated, I understood so much about them and how they’d clash, that the story had a life of its own in my head. But not years of my life; this isn’t my magnum opus, it’s a story I’ve had in my head for a week, and I haven’t thought about it actively in days.

The book you’re reading, is part of the process of creating characters who are unforgettable. They’re not unforgettable because they’re, “so cool,” they’re unforgettable, because once you know what a character will and will not do to get what they want (and once you know what that want is) the characters can start to write themselves. Once characters clash, it becomes so clear who each character is and isn’t, and they can stick with you, and make writing a joy because the writing becomes a breeze.

Building Character Webs
The biggest change between the AI’s draft, and my revisions, was making the characters be related to one another. As a writer, I have some experience working in jobs, but most of my existence is typing away at a screen without co-workers to bother me or buoy me. This leads to a common pitfall in writers, which is writing about writing, or writing about “the creative process,” and those stories fall flat.

Stories are easier when two characters are in conflict. But if we live in isolation too much, it can lead to stories where there's no one to be in conflict with.

That’s why the first thing I did was make the station chief the aunt of the main character, because I do know what that relationship is like. (Though I’m not even using my own aunts exclusively for this, but also old friends of my mother’s who have been in our lives for decades.)

Next I took one of the forgettable characters who existed to be the wheeling-and-dealing delinquent, and redesigned that character to be the main character’s mom. This does several things:

It creates a nice continuity of rulebreaking for the main character, not “falling far from the tree” (of delinquency)
Though, sometimes a parent like that, wishes their offspring will be more straight-laced than they were, since following the crowd confers benefits.
It creates divide between the station chief who is very straight-laced, and the main character who is a bit delinquent.
The lifelong nature of their relationship also means the main character cannot be so easily discarded by the station chief. This keeps the station chief from using her doomsday options with the main character, and gets more juice out of their scenes together.
It creates a generation-long divide between the straight-laced station chief, and her wheeling-and-dealing sister who raised Zenith to wheel and to deal.
When Zenith skirts regulations, he’s not a delinquent employee, he is the station chief’s delinquent sister’s spiritual successor. Zenith is version 2 of the same problem his mother posed.

Once I had the mom and aunt for Zenith, I took a character who was very nothingburger in the AI’s draft, Clay, and turned him into Zenith’s brother.

I liked the idea that Zenith’s mother had two mouths to feed, and that she felt unsupported by the corporate or government entity that was funding this multi-decade expedition, so she started doing things her way.

Clay was a difficult character to pump life into, so Clay got a wife who didn’t exist in the AI’s draft. 

Clay’s wife went through several iterations until a clear point of view for her emerged. Clay’s wife, Praxis, is the head of logistics for the outpost; the quartermaster (who Zenith must get macguffins from) works for her. She’s based on the Dutch principle of striving for balance in speech, never going too “over the top,” and always qualifying a compliment or consolation with a counterpoint to show how things are not as bad or good as we are making them out to be.

Then Clay started to make sense by contrast with Praxis.

Clay’s mother runs a sort of shadow economy within this outpost. Clay was conceived of as a medic of some sort, and he was fairly happy go lucky as written. But now, his respectable job takes on a defiant meaning. Also he married someone who goes out of her way to speak plainly about the things she knows about, and she’s the one who knows what supplies are available and where they’re supposed to go. This is in contrast to Zenith and Clay’s mother, who got items on the side, and wouldn’t be forthcoming of how she got those items.

Clay marrying Praxis is a declaration. It’s a subtle act of cold war.

If Zenith is the apple that didn’t fall far from the tree, then Clay is the apple who saw what the first apple was getting into, sprouted legs, and walked defiantly as far away from the tree as was comfortable; just far enough to make a statement. His doomsday became much more clear; he’s the sibling who threatens to leave the family’s drama. His chipper demeanor is conditional: the family must not get even more wild than it already is.

So Clay has a rivalry with his brother Zenith.

Meridian, the station chief, has a rivalry with her sister Contour, the mother of Zenith and Clay.

Same rivalry. Two generations: brother vs brother, sister vs sister.

Meridian is derisive, and imperial about her destain for her sister Contour, and her nephew Zenith.

Clay’s rivalry with Zenith has practically that same ideological divide, but Clay goes about things differently than Meridian does.

It matters that Station Chief Meridian’s rivalry with her sister Contour predates Clay’s rivalry with Zenith. Family get-togethers were hard, uncomfortable. Aunt Meridian was always mean to their mother; Clay watches the animosity between his mom and her sister, and decides things will be different for Zenith and him. Clay agrees with Meridian’s assessment that his mother, Contour, needs to get back in line with station guidelines and regulations, but watching Meridian’s approach create even more problems, Clay fought his battles with a smile.

Now, Clay, who was happy-go-lucky in the AI’s draft, for no reason, uses that happiness as his go-to move. In any scene with Clay, he will be using his demeanor as a tool to further his agenda.

Agenda: Every character knows what they prefer. That’s their agenda: to get things the way they’d prefer. “Nobody speaks unless they want something,” my playwright teacher would tell us, quoting maybe (I think?) David Mamet.

When we know what characters want, they’re easier to write.

When we know what each character thinks is the best way to get what they want, they’re easier to write.

Both what they want, and what they’re willing to do to get it, become clearer, as soon as the characters are threatened by one another. It doesn’t have to be a physical conflict, but it has to have a type of metaphorical life-or-death stakes.

Clay was the weakest character in the original story that the AI tried to write. Clay did nothing.

Now, Clay still is the character who appears to have the least agency, and yet: that demeanor is intentional, it’s part of Clay’s strategy to get what he wants. Clay is the character who is willing to lose most battles in order to keep the peace. He’s not bad at fighting his battles, he’s good at surrendering the battles he’d rather skip. It’s hard to write someone who is bad at fighting their battles, because they’ll just make stupid moves, and audiences hate when characters make moves that feel forced and stupid. But a character who is good at surrendering, is an expert in his own right, and we like to watch experts do their thing.

Next, I moved Zenith in with Clay and Praxis. This is a move held-over from another story I tried to write for half a decade. Single character who lives with a couple. Now I’ve never actually lived in-house with a couple, but as the gay guy in my friend group (so I never had a wife), I didn’t partner up like all of them did, and I was often invited to be a third wheel at their various houses. So, I know enough about this dynamic to be able to see where the conflicts arise.

If Clay lives with Zenith, he has to be extra-careful about keeping the peace. This will create tension, but more importantly, it will mean that Clay always has a reason to, bring his ‘A’ game, to his scenes with his brother Zenith: if the disagreement lingers, it will be there at dinnertime.

And… it will impact the love of his life, Praxis.

It’s not that Praxis doesn’t get along with Zenith, as much as Praxis just is not bothered much by the fact that she does not like Zenith living with them. Also she is very dedicated to the practicality of the limitations of the station they live in: Zenith bunking with them, means another room elsewhere, available for the logistics she is responsible for. It’s a trade. Praxis does not love a trade, the way Contour, Zenith and Clay’s mother loves a trade, but Praxis understands the exchange-nature of humanity, and simply keeps all of the trades above board, and transparently documented. In a way, she’s one of the only people who has no strong opinion against Zenith, because she has expertly dealt with him.

Watch how once I moved these characters into relationship to one another, I’m no longer starting with a blank page and a weak mandate. In every scene, the main character Zenith, doesn’t just have to get what he needs, and he isn’t just going to use his go-to moves, he’s also going to have to consider the possible fallout of his actions which will cut away possibilities until there are not many things he even could do.

I always assumed I was a plotter (a writer who plans out the entire story in big detailed outlines to be filled in) given how much preparation I naturally want to do for a piece of work. But once I saw this process of capturing the perpetual disagreements between characters who love each other, it became clear that this is the type of writing that works for me: A relationships writer.

Know the relationships, know the story.

Not on Earth, Negotiation, Prep Work
None of that relationship-mapping extended to the quartermaster herself; she’s still as blank canvas as she ever was, except that now we know three things about her:

Zenith is the station chief’s nephew
That’s her boss’s boss
But also Station Chief Meridian doesn't treat Zenith like he’s her darling, so it’s not like the quartermaster has to coddle him
BUT, this is the nephew of her boss’s boss; that’s stressful, no matter how it goes
Zenith’s sister-in-law is her boss
Praxis is a good boss, maybe the best boss ever, because Praxis intentionally doesn’t get emotional, and never shies away from bad news
Good bosses are hard to come by. The quartermaster chooses loyalty to Head of Logistics Praxis, and not to Station Chief Meridian.
Zenith’s mother runs a shadow economy
Station Chief Meridian doesn’t want any infractions of protocol, though she is inconsistent and therefore bad at enforcing that rule on her sister Contour who takes advantage of Meridian’s sisterly affordance.
But the quartermaster is loyal first to Praxis. Praxis does not care about protocol for protocol-sake. If Praxis hears a good deal, she takes it (she documents it first, but she takes the deal).
Zenith has failed to come through before. But that’s not the real problem; Zenith only shows up when he needs some specific item. Contour fails to come through plenty of the time, and that is a dealbreaker for the quartermaster. If Zenith can come up with a good enough deal, the quartermaster will allow it, per Praxis’s wishes, but the quartermaster cannot pass up an opportunity to use Zenith’s frantic need to get him to clear up his mother’s debts. (No one else on the station has that leverage over Contour and her shadow economy, since Station Chief Meridian is hit or miss, and at this time: miss.) Zenith must become the quartermaster’s tool.

Look at the direction that gives us, AND THE QUARTERMASTER DOESN’T EVEN HAVE A NAME YET!

Clearly, Zenith is going to be turned away from the quartermaster, just like in the infodump version of this scene, BUT, he will be turned away with a quest list that now includes, “go clean up your mother’s mess.”

If Zenith leaves the quartermaster on his own, he could still manage to figure out that he should go around the station looking for people he can curry deals with to get his macguffins, but because of the go-to move of his mom, he has no choice of what to do next.
This is paraphrased from Naomi of IttyBiz, who was explaining the difference between choices and decisions, within the context of running your own business.

We like choices. Choices feels like options.

Decisions, on the other hand- that word, ‘decide’ the suffix, ‘cide’ that’s the same suffix in ‘homicide’ -to ‘decide’ something means to ‘cut-away’ the other options.

We like options, we hate giving up our other options in order to commit to a decision.

Speaking of decision, ‘to cut away,’ surgery, surgeons, doctors, Doctor House: Let’s talk briefly about the fundamental principle of Doctor House.

House M.D. was a medical detective show, that operated not-unlike a police procedural, except that the culprit wasn’t a human who’d committed a crime, the culprit they needed to identify was:

Which disease even is this??

Often, once the team diagnosed the correct illness, they’d apply treatment in the last five minutes and 9 times out of 10 the patient lived.

It was an hour-long show. The way they kept up their act for that amount of time came from them guessing wrong which ailment was plaguing the patient.

But each time they got something wrong, it would react with the body in some new and interesting way.

The team that worked with Doctor House would lament that, “oh no now things are even weirder,” but Doctor House (who had no empathy for his patients) delighted because: “Weirder, means fewer things it could be.”

This is why decisions matter. Success comes from making a decision.

Leon Blum 1872-1950:

“Life does not give itself to one who tries to keep all its advantages at once. I have often thought that morality may perhaps consist solely in the courage of making a [decision].”

(The quote originally said making a choice, but I changed it to have consistency of terminology for this book.)

Life does not give itself up to the one who tries to keep all its advantages at once.

Zenith having no choice but to follow up on his mother’s mess, makes the story, ‘give itself up,’ to us.

Instead of trying to, ‘keep all its advantages at once,’ we are forced into the only story that can exist, given the logic and consistency we’ve set up, character by character.

Zenith is not going to stop working on his robot, because it’s tied to his lifelong dream of succeeding so spectacularly that his mom will stop needing to operate on the sly.

To succeed at working on his robot and achieving on his dream?

He has to delve right into the heart of his mother’s problems if he is to clean up her mess.

That is such great theme, and I didn’t even plan that when I started working on this section. This stuff happens when we do the work of building the logic of the characters first, and pit them against one another’s lives.

Let’s write the scene and get out, this is great stuff.

Not on Earth, Negotiation, First Draft

	Zenith sighed. He almost took a step down the long hallway where the quartermaster stood, holding the keys to his future. He did not take that step. Instead, he sighed again, this time leaning slightly to the side, unconsciously sizing her up.

	“Just don’t fuck it up,” he thought to himself. His sister-in-law’s dining table flashed in front of his eyes, and the image of his fate if he failed was painful enough that he did take his first step down the hallway, but not before his right hand unconsciously swiped in front of him, as if to banish the vision that would await him if his request went poorly.

	Not even half-way down the hall, the quartermaster made him. He’d been there before; she sized him up immediately, involuntarily sighing, though not as Zenith had; her sigh was the prayer of a woman who was about to perform one of her least favorite parts of her job.

	“No.” Said with as little energy as possible, rehearsed with every step Zenith had taken down the hallway since she’d seen him.

	“I really am sorry-” Zenith prioritized his relationship to the quartermaster over her answer, though he was determined that her answer change.

	“Stop. Zenith-” The ‘stop’ was authority. The ‘Zenith’ was a plea of friendship. Said as one does to a person who is in the wrong, but we are so used to it that we have exhausted all options we know of, and feel helpless if the other person does not change.

	“I know.” Again, prioritizing the relationship. The relationship mattered. There were 187 people on this planet, and she was one of the ones who hated him the least, despite their many fallings-out. “You’re right. I don’t even- I don’t know why, I thought this was a good idea.” A retreat. A tactical retreat, with an intention to save the friendship but still get what he came for.

	“I have a hard enough time justifying giving you station resources for your, ‘creations,’ when we’re flush.” Imploring him to reason; surely he would understand this time; if he didn’t understand this time, then he was never going to be reasonable, and there was no point.

	“I know.” Actual guilt. Zenith hadn’t meant, of course, for his past attempts to fail; no one gets a ‘great idea’ with the intention that the investment of time and capital will be a waste. “I-” An attempt to defend; rescinded; not the time; and not a defensible position really. “Yes. This is wrong.” Admission. Half-tactical though, half-real, because his conscience said that the station wasn’t bountiful, and wouldn’t be for decades, so for decades they’d have to operate on a tight budget of resources shipped in from homeworld. But half-tactical. The admission would set her at ease that he was listening- and he was listening, it just hurt to. If he couldn’t get the macguffins, then Valence would never--

	“It’s-” She was making a decision, and Zenith knew it. “If there weren’t a supply shortage, I’d still feel uncomfortable giving you even more of our resources to your experiments, but that’s not even the biggest problem today.”

	Oh no.

	“Zenith, -honestly I don’t even know if you two talk anymore,”

	Noooooo.

	All the preparation for this favor to go well, and he hadn’t though at all about the favor that might be levied on him in return.

	The quartermaster shook her head. It wasn’t at Zenith. It wasn’t even towards the person she was about to mention. It was the shake of someone who lives on a burgeoning planet. Every person on the outpost had their version of this head-shake. It spoke of the tangle they all had to live in, constantly, every life impinged upon the other, until no one is to blame because ‘the situation’ was at fault.

	“I haven’t had to chase down too many of your mother’s debts, Zenith, but I need this one. The supply shortage cut into our whatsits and we’re not stocked up enough on them to- I worry-”

	Earnest. The worry was genuine. A moment of shared vulnerability, for the actual precariousness of their situation- not the two of them, but everyone on the planet, if-

	“It’s bad?” Fully paused on his own favor, to genuinely assess the favor needed of him.

	“It could be real bad Zenith. Do you- Can you talk to her?” A genuine question; she didn’t actually know if he could talk to her or not.

	He could. 

	It wouldn’t be awful.

	It would be fine.

	It would be… costly… -Costly enough that…

	“If-”

	“Yes. If you can get her to return with all -or at least most- of the whatsits she promised, then I will hear your request for… whatever it is that you need this time. …What do you need this time?”

	“Macguffins. Two.”

	“Absolutely not.” She needed the leverage though. “One. -Fucking hell, Zenith.” Relief that they have a deal, but the tickling strain of a deal that costs far too much, and even then doesn’t satisfy all parties.

	Close enough. One wouldn’t be enough, but there was always room to bargain now that something was on the table. His mom taught him that. As he thought about his task ahead, cleaning up his mother’s mess, his eyes shot up to think about his mother’s past and present and future… was there always room to bargain? Sometimes the lessons we accept as indelible fact tarnish into cheaper trinkets the longer we live, and the better we see the real-life of the advice-giver.

	Nah. She was wrong about a lot. Not this. One wouldn’t be enough. But there was always room to bargain once something was on the table.

	A lie, not malicious, just an asterisk of his true meaning that need not be examined until he had the whatsits, ”Deal.” And then, “Okay. I will…”

	“Yeah-” She was casual now, just one of 187 other people on a rock, not the person standing between him and his dream. “Do you even talk to her anymore?”

	The dinner table flashed in front of his eyes again. This time his sister-in-law’s eyes were fixed on him, as if to audit his answer to the question.

	“Um-” he began, stalling for time, not wanting to give himself away, wanting to make sure the right answer found its way through the quartermaster, and up to her boss, Praxis, his sister-in-law and defacto landlord. Landlord on a planet with finite square footage that included oxygen. He thought of bunking in his laboratory again. “No!” Shot out of him, almost too quickly.

	“Hmm.”

	Dammit, not almost too quickly; too quickly.

	Fuck it. “Alright, yes. Just-”

	“I won’t tell her, it’s fine. She’s very reasonable about this shit; she cares about the deal, Zenith. All she’ll really care about is if you have the whatsits.”

	“You don’t have to eat dinner with her…”

	“Ha. Zenith she doesn’t hate my guts; I eat with her just fine.”

	“Does Praxis hate my guts?”

	“Nah.” True but with a caveat that required confessing. “I can’t say that she respects you Zenith. If you started doing your assigned job instead of- what even is it this time?”

	“Valence.”

	“I- you have too many names for them, which project is Valence?”

	“Robot.”

	“Oh! The terraforming robot. Yeah that’s not gonna work.”

	This line cracked the finish a bit. The rebuttal was a bit of a bite, “So the not-respect isn't limited to Praxis then.” An accusation. An accusation of friendship. A demand that she take it back if they were going to be friends still somehow.

	Sigh. Sigh of relent. But sigh of relent that there isn’t much point fighting, and that there is plenty to lose if not mended. “I don’t want to be dis-respecfful toward you Zenith. I don’t understand a lot of what you do, -and, frankly I don’t understand how you justify avoiding your assigned duties to do whatever you do. That’s- I don’t not-respect you, I just don’t know sometimes how I’m supposed to respect you when you put your dreams above the outpost, a lot. You know I don’t mean any disrespect, right? It’s just-”

	Valid, if shitty, points. Not as valid as she thinks they are. Hard to argue though.

	“The shortage.” Throw her a bone, get out of here before we make it worse.

	“The shortage! Yes- You get it.” 

	He forced a smile that was intended to take the place of further agreement that they were, indeed, two wonderful chums who were just in nothing but total agreement.

	It looked like a twitch the way he turned to walk away, their interaction concluded, he had his mission, his pride needed tending to, and it was crucial he not make things worse, but almost immediately he canceled the turn to walk away and stared back at her a moment.

	A reprisal for saying all that stuff about respect.

	“You know I’m going to ask you for that second macguffin, right?”

	“Zenith, I fucking do.”

At time of writing, 1,502 words. That’s a chapter. That lets me walk away feeling like, “I wrote something today.”
Driven to Build Robot, Seduction, Prep Work
The last scene was a negotiation, each character brought what the need to the table and they were both willing somewhat to compromise.

This scene is a seduction; a character will cave.

In the infodump version of this scene, we had Zenith talking to Valence, his robot. In the original AI draft of the story, this is where Clay was introduced.

Three person scenes are harder to write, than two person scenes, by maybe a whole magnitude.

Two person scenes go back and forth, so there is a predictable rhythm to the writing.

With three characters in a scene, if one character talks, we have to make a decision every line about who will talk next.

If we have no strategy for the scene, it can feel arbitrary.

If you’ve spent time in group discussions, you’ll recognize instinctively, that the loudest voice in the room will take hold most of the time.

That means two things:

One of the characters will likely speak very little; it won’t be an equitable exchange.
When the quiet character speaks, it will be goosed by the topic; the quiet character demands the floor when they’re close to their doomsday condition.

Of Clay and Valence, Valence is the quieter of the two characters. Zenith is almost always the loudest voice in the room; this is not because he is the main character, but it helps; it’s possible to write a main character who is the quiet listener, and especially novels are the best-suited format for that story (a stage play would require soliloquy, and a film would require voice over of the main character’s thoughts), but if you want ease, make your main character the loudest character in the room.

So we can infer that Zenith will be doing most of the talking, interrupted by Clay, and listened to by Valence, who will plod along with the group, until something triggers his doomsday condition, and he wrests control of the conversation in an alarming way.

This is a seduction scene however, so one of the characters needs to cave.

Because Valence is likely to be forced into a situation where he puts his foot down, he is not likely to cave.

Just because Zenith is the loudest one in the room, does not mean that Clay should be the one to cave. My first instinct was that Clay should cave, as Clay is the peace-at-any-cost man for the family.

But sometimes it can help to write a scene in which audience expectations can be defied, if there is an opening for it within the logical consistency of our story.

And there is.

In the original draft, Clay was not Zenith’s brother.

In the original draft, Zenith was not on a quest to clean up his mother’s mistakes.

In the original draft, Zenith did not live in the spare room of Clay and Praxis’s domicile.

Zenith owes Clay.

Zenith has a reason to cave.

Audience expectations (when first seeing genial Clay, and having just seen Zenith spar with the quartermaster) may be that Clay will provide no challenge for Zenith to get what he wants.

But Zenith owes Clay. When Clay asks Zenith for something, Zenith is not in a position to say no.
Driven to Build Robot, Seduction, First Draft
	“Mom said you’re looking for her.” Zenith’s brother Clay, stood in the doorway to Zenith’s workshop. Clay barely looked up from his device as he said this.

	Zenith blinked. The blink was the blink of a man who has lost all freedoms in life and is empowered only to choose the moment at which he blinks or stares.

	Zenith clenched his eyes shut. Clenching his eyes shut made him feel like he could squat down, blast off, and fly off of this stupid planet to the paradise he deserved. The tension in his eyelids felt like the energy was building at his feet for his daring escape.

	Springing his eyelids open, Zenith flew into a rage at his brother, startling Clay just enough that he clicked his device off and attended to the problem at hand.

	“HOW. HOW DOES SHE ALREADY KNOW THAT? It takes twenty minutes to walk from the quartermaster’s office to this workshop; I know, I timed it the year I had to lose weight. Your office is at least ten or fifteen minutes away, in the other direction. That means, that for you to be standing here, she had to know I was looking for her, within five minutes of the conversation where I agreed to look for her. It was an abandoned hallway! There was no one there. I know because she trained us to pay attention for eavesdroppers and don’t do it on purpose but I still do it! So how does she know Clay?”

	Clay continued to give his brother his undivided attention, but he gave the usual amount of investment. “Yeah, I don’t know.”

	Zenith seethed, decompressing from another episode of his mother’s spider-like hold over the station.

	Clay continued, for lack of anything better to do until Zenith calmed down. “It’s weird right,” which was accompanied by a shrug so small it had to be affected by the planetoid’s non-standard gravity.

	Zenith knew that Clay did not have the answers to their mother’s wily ways. Zenith contemplated pressing Clay to care more, but a lifetime of experience had taught him that there were only two subjects where Clay was pissed at their mother, and this wasn’t either of them.

	Zenith opened his mouth to ask where the message told him to meet her, but the frustration still had him in his grip, and the words seemed more complicated to form than usual, as if he were controlling his lips through a system of pulleys and weights.

	Clay did know this expression. “You want to know where the message said to find mom?”

	With the solemnity of a monk, Zenith summoned his will to word up the word, “Yes.”

	“Message didn’t say,” Clay was back to his practiced nonchalance, though he did brace himself for the part of the message that he knew would erupt Zenith. “‘Don’t come looking for me, I’ll find you,’” Clay said, quoting their mother’s words with an experienced tone of voice as if the two of them had repeated that message to one another for decades, which of course, they had.

	“She acts like she’s a fugitive from the law.” Pointed, plosive words from Zenith, said through a prison of clenched teeth.
	
	“She is Zenith,” Clay finally rising to the bait. One of the two things that drove Clay to emotional upheaval was anyone trying to exonerate or downplay what he saw as their mother’s crimes against the station. “She made it seem cool when we were growing up, and now that  ONE OF US HAS GROWN UP it’s obvious to that one that making her thefts ‘seem cool’ was actually a pretty cheap trick to play on her two sons who didn’t know any better!”

	Zenith cocked his head further and further to the side. Zenith often did this when they talked. It just felt necessary to talk to Clay while the horizon line was skewed to one side. The extreme tilt of his point of view as he rotated his head unconsciously reminded Zenith that there was no convincing Clay that their mother deserved to move freely amongst the station. Admitting defeat, he dropped the tension in his neck an shoulders and slouched past Clay’s body in the doorframe to his workshop. Zenith had work to do.

	Valence was about eight feet tall, full of hard, sharp edges that you get when you’re building a robot that nobody asked for, out of parts that people were willing to part with. Zenith kept a tarpaulin over Valence, ostensibly to prevent anyone from grazing a corner and cutting themselves on Valence’s metal frame. The real reason, which Zenith was yet to admit, was that he was embarrassed by Valence’s unfinished construction. A terraforming robot that does work a human cannot, is valuable, no matter what he looks like; a functioning robot can look like junk, but still be valued. But onlookers glanced at Valence with an apprehension that hurt Zenith to see. Clay was hurt in that same way when someone suggested that their mom was just unconventional, and that her off-books dealings were just, “a big misunderstanding.” One brother bore the shame of what their family had been, and the other clung to the dreams that could one day exonerate their family’s legacy. Both wanted to be looked upon as ‘normal.’

	“That it then?” Clay swung into the workshop, never fully leaving the door frame which now braced the middle of his back. “I do have patients.”

	Zenith didn’t look up from Valence’s base station in the hip, where a Zenith-sized human could comfortably issue manual commands into a flip-down keyboard. “You could’ve sent me the message.” Zenith rolled his eyes, “Come to think of it, why the hell didn’t she send me the message directly.”

	Clay, now removed from one of his two hot-button issues, resumed his cadence as the Level-Headed Brother™. “Zenith, I think she does it so we have to see each other.”

This made Zenith spin ‘round.

“I live at your house. I live with you and Praxis. I know what you had for breakfast today. How much closer does she expect us to be?”

This was a mistake, and Zenith knew it. Clay had resumed Good-Brother™ mode, but his other issue was that the two of them were not as close as Clay wanted them to be. Only Clay seemed to know what that closeness looked like, because to Zenith they already saw too much of each other.

Clay entered the room. Clay no longer had the doorframe to hold him up.

He drooped.

“I’d… I’d like us to talk more outside of chatter of the day during a meal.”

He’s right, Zenith thought. We see each other, but Zenith had often lamented that he had no one to talk to about his stage fright of announcing and showcasing Valence at the Tournament next weekend. His brother and sister-in-law were in his orbit, but neither of them were truly, ‘in his life.’ 

“You think she knows that we sit at the table and we only talk about bullshit and we otherwise ignore each other’s lives?”

“I really, really do Zenith.”

“HOW does she-”

“I don’t care Zenith. She knows somehow. We’re building a planet from scratch, this isn’t 1912, she doesn’t have to travel the Atlantic to see her family. She spies on us. I don’t know how. I know- I know she cares. I wish she would fucking own up to this stupid game she plays, and deal with the consequences, but nobody has any time to go looking for her, we are building a planet from scratch. It’s easy to hide and she does it. I don’t know why in the hell she signed onto this life if she wasn’t ready to live inside the authority of the station, but hell, she did. She left her home planet, so that our home planet could be a rock. I really think she is trying to force us together when she sends me the message for you, and you the message to give me. I don’t know the last time she sent me a message for me. They’re always for you. Do you get any messages that are for you?”

“My messages are always for you. I haven’t even given you half of them.”

“ZENITH!”

“Yeah that’s shitty of me, I’m sorry Clay.” Zenith, completed Valence’s boot sequence, and turned around to face his brother, while his life’s work (his latest ‘life’s work’) chugged to life.

“I don’t- I- Most of them are gone now, I don’t remember.”

“These aren’t recent messages?”

“No like- for… years, it’s been years I haven’t been giving you every message she’s sent. It’s never something important; I give you the important ones… Just. I don’t like-”

“She doesn’t give us control, does she?”

“Yeah, that’s it. I just… wanted control; I couldn’t make my dreams come true, but I can skip an errand that my mom sends me on. Cool consolation prize.”

Clay thought, hard, to the side, his eyes straining with calculations.

Clay mirrored the times that Zenith exaggeratedly cocked his head to the side, and stared at his brother. Clay often did the head-tilt. While Zenith did the head tilt to force his perspective to see the slant of the world, Clay did the head-tilt because Zenith did the head-tilt. It was a genuine instance of imitation being the highest form of flattery.

Clay assessed at Zenith, with a tsk, “These times that you didn’t give me the messages… you were working at the time?”

Zenith looked away. Surely Valence would finish booting just any time now, surely surely.

Clay’s tongue did a quick lap around his mouth before speaking again. “And of course, by working, I don’t mean doing your actual job on the station, but your after-hours -though I don’t know why we call it that because you’d have to have some BEFORE hours put in for the label to be correct- work?”

“Sometimes, when I’m working on Valence-” Zenith pleaded.

“Uh huh!” The end of the conversation. Was this a third thing that made Clay mad? 50% more anger options than when the day began. A serious uptick.

“Mom’s in hydroponics!” Clay blasted at his feet.

Zenith shot up at this, abandoning his fake inputs into Valence who had booted up and was standing behind the two of them, silently, as per Zenith’s actual inputs when he had been booting Valence up. The mention of Hydroponics made Valence chitter.

“What are you talking about? What do you mean she’s in hydroponics?” Zenith looked frantically from eye to eye, or would have if Clay had left his head up to meet Zenith’s gaze; as it was Zenith looked frantically back and forth between two spots on Clay’s head.

Clay inhaled a considerable amount of breath, and looked back up, and answered Zenith with his whole body making a shrug, “Praxis’s people think she’s in Hydroponics. I don’t- I don’t actually know that she’s in Hydroponics, I just-” He sighed. “I think it’s really shitty that you didn’t give me those messages because you were working on that thing.” He said, turning his whole-body shrug into a whole-body gesture toward 8 foot tall Valence. “So- …I don’t know. I- We think she’s in Hydroponics. I kinda want you to get the hell out of here and go look for her, so I don’t yell at you. I don’t know if she’s in Hydroponics, but you should go look for her in Hydroponics. I wish you could have given me the messages man, that’s my mom. Don’t, don’t put that walking metal box over me, I think I’ve earned-”

“I can give you your messages, Clay. I don’t have all of them but I was present for sixteen of-” Valence’s dulcet tones were interrupted by a cutting harshness that Zenith was not familiar with.

“This thing knows the messages but not me?” Zenith wasn’t sure he’d seen this version of Clay; was this the man operating the Best-Brother-In-The-World™ machine that Zenith usually had to talk to? This Clay was intriguing. Is this who his brother was? Part of him at least.

It hit Zenith at once that the solutions to his brother problems might be the very thing his brother was always hounding him about: “I don’t give him a place to show me the real Clay, that’s why he feels so goddamn fake,” Zenith thought to himself.

“Come with me.” Zenith said, changing the subject back to the trek to Hydroponics. Not a calculated move to evade the litany of the missed messages. Genuine. Clay was just as distressed as he was about his mother’s ‘eccentricities.’ He deserved to come with, and there was no time like the present to start being the brother that Zenith knew Clay wished he would be… if it mean that Annoying-As-Shit-And-Fake-As-Hell-Clay™ would give up the ghost.

“Come with me to Hydroponics,” Zenith repeated, before Clay had time to formulate a response. Then Zenith remembered, “Unless- You said you have patients to get to.”

Clay rolled an eye and twitched a mouth corner that said turnabout was fair play, “I- I lied about that.”

Zenith’s eyes shot up. Playful. Brotherly. Not winning, just engaging. “You lied about that. Today? Or…”

Clay found at that moment the far corner of Zenith’s workshop to be of amazing interest, as he crooned his neck to see the fabulous nothing-there. “Yeah. For- For years.”

“Mhmm. Let’s go to Hydroponics. I have a sudden urge to get the hell out of here as was previously suggested by my lying brother who lies.”

Clay smiled and headed for the door, then stopped when he realized Zenith was hurriedly packing components into Valence’s leg.

Clay caught up with the packing. “No.”

“They’re coming with!” Zenith said with an air of brotherly finality.

“Oh god.”

“Yeah they’re gonna let me know if you fib about your work schedule to avoid me, and give you all the messages that you never got when I was avoiding you.” 

“I thought they didn’t work.”

“They can’t terraform, they can walk. The terraforming part is experimental. We have robots, Clay, that part was remedial for me.”

“I can’t build a robot…”

“I can’t… whatever it is you do… apply antiseptic.”

“You can’t apply antiseptic? -And also I do much more than apply antiseptic!”

“Mom’s not gonna be in Hydroponics Clay; I’m sure you’ll have all the time in the world  to tell me about what your job actually is while we visit every spot on the station looking for her.”

“You’re gonna ask me …about my job?”

“I’m gonna start being a better brother Clay. Like you fucking asked. And we’re gonna confront mom. Together. And get the shit she owes the station so I can get my two macguffins, in time to enter Valence into the contest.”

“What’s she owe?”

“Something like 40 whatsits.”

“Oh yeah, there's no way she has that.”

“I fucking know.”

“Zenith,” Valence interrupted, “would you like to know the next shipment of whatsits that is scheduled for moondrop?”

“Is it before next weekend,” Zenith asked flatly, knowing the answer, placating his precious prize-winning entry.

“It is not.”

“Then no, Valence. I do not need to know when the next shipment of whatsits will get here; they will not get here soon enough.”

Clay smiled smugly. He hated the robot, but liked hearing that it annoyed his brother; his brother having done a poor enough job of programming them that they missed the context of the brothers’ conversation. “Are you gonna make them smarter, before the competition? You know so you can win and graduate us off this rock once and for all?”

“They set dynamite. Valence sets dynamite charges to reroute waterways once we have enough water sources converted for human consumption.”

“So no.”

“They don’t need to talk Clay. Their job is to set dynamite.”

“You needed a whole robot just to set dynamite.”

“If you want to blow some shit up for fun, no. If you want to project decades-long waterflow and its impact on the surrounding geology and ecosystem, then Valence will save the day.”

“What part are you missing?”

“I am missing the dynamite.”

Clay smirked; he knew that. But at least it was more fun than the talks at breakfast and dinner.

	Zenith thought so too, even though the talk was at his expense.

	Neither brother said so, but they both felt lighter than they had in some time as they headed off to Hydroponics in search of their mother’s missing whatsits.

2,765 Words. And technically, ‘three scenes.’ When Zenith enters into the workshop, we move from the brothers’ hallway scene, to the brothers’ workshop scene, and finally the brothers’ and Valence exodus scene.

It’s worth noting something about this sequence.

Zenith caves. Zenith reaches the conclusion that he should let his brother get his wish and allow the two of them to open up to one another. At the time writing it, it felt like a weak moment, and yet, it led to another 700+ words. That final stretch of story is very low stakes, and in a final draft, may very well be cut down to encourage faster pacing of the story overall.

But don’t discount the opportunity to talk post-conflict in a scene with characters; the way each character winds down after a conflict is also driven by the doomsday that both characters are avoiding using.

They tussle -whether seduction, negotiation, or fight- then they get some time off to try and figure out how to still be in each other’s lives. That’s still action.

If there are clashes, there will be wounds.

Healing is an active verb that you can get plenty of storytelling out of, if your style allows for it.
Supply Shortage, Fight, Prep Work
The Station Chief is Zenith and Clay’s aunt.

Clay mused about why their mother agreed to sign up to this terraforming life? It was to be near her sister, Meridian.

-That wasn’t even something I planned, by the way. This is still Day 4 of working on this story, and I know very few of the salient details. But it’s what makes economical sense. The least costly reason for a character like their mother, Contour, to be the forever-rebel of this mid-terraformed planet is because she followed her sister there, and wasn’t remotely ready for it once stuck. Because otherwise why is she there? The terraforming company doesn’t have subpoena power, it’s volunteer only. But someone who followed their ambitious sister and then realized she’d made a mistake, fits the profile of the absent mother we’ve seen Zenith and Clay describe so far.

That means that we have to make Meridian even more life-long ambitious than she was originally written.

In the AI draft, Meridian was largely a rules-obsessed character who would learn to soften up by the end of the story. To which, the AI gave her scenes where she was more easy-going by the end of the story, but it made zero effort to come up with a reason for that shift, anywhere in the middle of the story where it would happen. Instead the early scenes said “Meridian accosts a rule infraction,” and the end scenes said, “Meridian sees a cadet doing something wrong, but slowly explains the safer way to do it.”

It’s fine bookends.

But only a human writer, it seems, can connect the two scenes with some sort of flip-the-script moment or progression.

Actually- progression is almost certainly what it will be.

That means we need to talk about Rune.

Rune is one of the characters from the original AI draft that I sort of liked. He was a philosopher security agent.

I got the sense that Rune and Meridian were the will-they-won’t-they cop duo of a million TV shows. So when it was time to build interlocking relationships, Rune became “Uncle Rune,” for all of ten minutes. I liked the idea that Rune would be a good influence both on Meridian over the course of the story, and also on Zenith. (Clay was not the brother yet at this point.) But if Rune was Zenith’s uncle, then that gave him hat-on-a-hat in terms of his authority over Zenith; he’s already the manifestation of authority on the station, so if he was also a participant of Zenith’s rearing, it would make it challenging for the two to feel comfortable arguing, which is the whole point of this technique: to make everybody fight.

So Rune became Meridian’s ex-husband. That tipped things too far the other way, because if he was Uncle Rune but had since fallen out with Aunt Meridian, it felt like family alliance lines would be drawn in the sand and Rune would be last dog to eat. I didn’t want him to be a punching bag either.

Then I stole. I didn’t steal a lot, just stole the bits I needed from another movie, where the woman in charge is kinda low-key dating her security man, and everyone sorta knows, and uses their social graces to ‘have no idea’ that anything is going on between them. That felt writable.

My job, is to write their relationship in a way that doesn’t make people point and shout, “Hey! That’s from x x, and x x 2, a x x!”

Rune won’t be in this fight.

Personally, I am not yet happy with the job I did trying to keep Valence in the conversation in the last exercise. These examples are kept largely unedited, so that people don’t go, “Yeah but you had forever to write that scene, how do we know you even used your fancy-shmancy method?”

I used the method, I wrote out the drafts, you have the drafts, they were written in one day, they were written within 8 days of starting the project. They are real. Any edits are for readability clarification, and not content edits.

This is why Rune will not be a participant in this fight, and why Clay will be absent as well.

To write the fight with multiple characters, I’d likely try writing it a few different ways, each time focusing on the disagreements between different pairs of characters in the fight, until I could ‘choreograph’ the final showdown.

I’m not going to do that. That feels like its own project.

This is a book about characters disagreeing. We’ll focus on the basics, and the basics is: two people.

(And also, speaking of basics, the fact that all these characters know one another, already, at the time the story starts, is another trick that makes the writing easier; no one is on their best behavior. They all see each other coming. They’ve all prepared in the mind for navigating these relationships. It’s easier; we don’t write scenes of strangers meeting unless we know what we’re doing.)

So, Rune won’t be in the fight, but Rune is the driving force behind Meridian’s arc in this story.

If we know we have a character who starts out one way, and we already see the end-scenes where they have ended up a distinctly different way, then we know something has to happen in the middle.

This will not be the fight that tips the balance. Usually the balance tip for a personality change like that is the Dark Night of the Soul which is usually 75% or more into the story.

But like we talked about in the Dark Night of the Soul chapter, if you don’t want your character to capitulate to death, they have to be as valuable to Chicago to the people in their orbit, so that they have no choice but to try even though no shiny easy option exists.

That means that we need to set up Meridian’s Great Chicago Fire moment now, not later. If you know you have a character with a big emotional worldview-shift like this, it’s harder to put that storyline in later.

So why mention Rune? Because Rune is a cudgel in this fight that Zenith can use to glance Meridian’s blows and shake her off the certainty of her position. i.e. “What does Rune think of this?”

The basis of this fight is that Meridian believes that death will come upon them all if procedure is not followed, because they live in the vacuum of space, but for the grace of every system in the station working.

Meridian will ultimately be confronted with her regulations not saving them from certain doom, because she had bias toward the things that have already happened to other outposts, and knows those plans, rote.

An important part of writing Meridian’s transformation is that she’s right… about them facing dangers. She isn’t right about which dangers or what the most effective course of action is.

Similarly, Zenith is also wrong about what the most effective course of action is; Zenith thinks his terraforming robot will change terraforming forever.

Both Meridian and Zenith are grappling with a tremendous amount of vulnerability they feel living on this station, and both are handling it in ways that have nothing to do with confronting the fear.

Rune matters because Rune knows that Meridian is using regulations to paper over her fear of living on a barren world with no one coming to save them. Zenith thinks he knows that’s what Meridian is doing, but Rune is in the inner circle. Rune knows this is the case, moreso than even Meridian herself knows why she’s doing what she’s doing.

Similarly, Rune also knows that Zenith has made a walking automaton parental figure to save him and take him away from their planetoid, to a mythical land where problems don’t happen. Rune, like Meridian and Contour, is old enough to have lived plenty of life on the homeworld. Rune knows it’s not so much worse up here, just the problems are very focused on the station. Rune knows that there are plenty of things waiting for them if they did leave the terraforming project and go to any other world. Rune knows the solutions that Zenith and Meridian need come from building bonds, not from controlling circumstances.

The difference, for this fight, is that Zenith is not above invoking Rune in order to jostle Meridian, and Meridian would never use Rune’s assessment of Zenith’s coping mechanisms as a weapon and be able to feel good about it. Zenith is happy to rebel against his aunt. Meridian is not happy to rebel against her nephew. She might though. The weapon is on the table.

This scene necessarily takes place later than the first two exercises.

Zenith was always going to bop around the entire station looking for things to make his robot work, but now we have a clearer situation: Zenith’s mom actively hides away, and now it’s not just Zenith looking for her, but Clay as well.

Other than the relationship map, the other main thing I changed from the AI’s draft attempt, was that in the AI’s version, everyone gets in a ship and goes and interacts with the anomalous biological thing that causes the disaster.

My playwright teacher gave us multiple assignments where two characters had to be trapped on a boat together; so that they couldn’t escape and they had to deal with one another. Similarly, I realized that I am not equipped or inclined to write a story where characters leave home and go on an adventure; I’m far better equipped to write a “Monster in the House” story, so I had them stay in the station, and have the biological disaster come to them.

Until the last exercise, I had no way to keep Clay in the story. I wasn’t motivated to have Zenith ask Clay to come with him to Hydroponics out of any conscious desire to fit the AI draft and keep the characters together; I genuinely saw that the two of them would have a chance to bond if they went, and I also realized that I’d pushed Clay far enough that he’d exhibited a genuinely new side of himself, and Zenith was curious.

Zenith needs family.

Meridian needs family.

That’s what this story was always about.

So I went along with Zenith bringing Clay on his hunt for their mother simply because I want to see them work their emotional crap out.

Many stories avoid allowing their characters to make mature decisions that commit them to the people in their lives, opting for running away.

I find running-away stories to be harder to write. I just always mush the characters together because then the story writes itself.

So this exercise is set further along in the story. Indeed, Contour was not in Hydroponics. I don’t know what evidence Praxis’s people had that she was there, but it won’t be a bad lead, just an incomplete one.

What I do know is that Zenith will have seen something in Hydroponics that was amiss.

I don’t know enough about hydroponics to know what that is, but I studied it ever-so-briefly, half a decade ago, for a different story about terraforming that got shelved.

But it won’t just be Hydroponics that is having an issue.

I will need Zenith to have this fight with Meridian, over communicators, while Zenith is standing in another department, and he will reference a third department that he and Clay went to ‘off screen,’ so that when Meridian contacts Zenith to chastise him about not only neglecting his duties, but that now he is bothering other departments who show up and do their jobs. -Actually that’s a good opening line; I’ll use that. Often times the prep work leads right into the story work that way. -Anyway, Zenith is not moved or interested by her admonitions; he’s heard them before. This is a fight, because both parties are trying to get the other side to hear something they don’t want to hear, and neither side is leaving room for negotiation.
Supply Shortage, Fight, First Draft
	“Not only are you neglecting your duties (as usual), but now I hear that you’re bothering other departments who actually show up and do their jobs!” Aunt Meridian was high-strung; this tone was familiar to Zenith. The content nagged at him though:

	“I always forget that mom doesn’t have a monopoly on knowing all the minutia that goes on in this station. Hello Auntie Meridian.” 

	The antimeridian is the 180th meridian of the planet Earth. Zenith learned long ago not to call his aunt “Auntie,” if he wanted to keep her in a good mood.

	Expecting an admonition for the nick-name, Zenith startled that his aunt continued on her tirade instead.

	“Zenith, dear, as we have discussed,” always ‘we,’ but the discussions referenced were mostly lectures with a low classroom participation quotient, “You are not going to win that competition,” he knew it was coming, but it stung hearing the baldness of it, “Therefore your time would be better spent AT. YOUR. JOB. while we are undergoing a lack of resources that could leave us without life support. It had happened before, at other outposts. I will not let you kill us all with your negligence.”

	This was harsher than usual. Not that he didn’t deserve a bit of chiding, he’d cut work far more than in past years to get Valence ready for the Tournament. But, something seemed…

	“That’s not what Uncle Rune thinks.” Deadeye shot. Guaranteed hit.

	“Do. NOT. Call him that. Zenith, I mean it, “ the second part almost in a whisper; like the entirety of the conversation was with Meridian the Station Chief, and “Zenith, I mean it,” was his mother’s sister begging him to behave. Almost as if someone was watching and she needed him to be discrete. The Terraforming Tournament was a virtual event; it consisted of eight separate planetoids connected via (a very expensive) realtime communication feed. Zenith’s eyes flitted upward, as if he could see past the ceiling into the orbit where satellites might be beaming down watchful eyes on this conversation.

	Why was there a shortage? Surely they weren’t losing funding…

	Pivot. Hard. Fake friendship. Recon. “You’re right, Station Chief, I’m sorry.” How to ask the question without getting it shot down. Adversarial incorrect statement, the only way. “After all, I can at least lay off the jokes until next month when the delayed shipment comes in…”

	Second hit. He heard it in the way she sharply sucked in air to correct him with the information he wanted. Muffled again though, like the plea from before. “There won’t be another shipment next month, I’ll have you know we’re not even getting our full scheduled shipment next month, let alone the missing shipment we’re all hurting from right now.” Stay silent; never interrupt your opponent when they’re making a mistake… “So you listen to me mister, you get back to reclamation, and keep your head down. And while you’re actually doing your job this time try to keep an eye out for things discarded that could still be used. -And NOT for that stupid robot! We have pipes nearly bursting in several departments, so you go back to work, and get us cuttings of pipe that can be soldered into our current infrastructure if the worst should happen.”

	No.

	No no.

	“Aunt Meridian, where are the pipes nearly bursting?” A tone of genuine concern and responsibility that took her nearly off guard, except for her years of practice hating everything he’d ever done.

	“Never. You. Mind. Zenith. The pipes are all three standard sizes, just get me pipe fittings of all. Three. Standard-”

	He cut her off; never something to do when trying to keep her in a good mood.

	“Was it near or in the livestock pens?” Each word careful, but forceful. There was no way she would believe him, even if he told her.

	“I-” an exasperated sigh of acquiescence. Probably for this moment only. “Yes. They’re saying it looks like the feeding tube is bulging.”

	“They didn’t say the feeding tube.” Running now. Get Valence, get Clay.

	“You weren’t there!” All Aunt, no Chief now.

	“They didn’t say the feeding tube, Aunt Meridian, they said the hydration tube!” Back, back the way they came. Valence would have completed the task by now, and not a moment to soon. Clay would be another story.

	“Yes… I- Yes…” A smart woman, Meridian did not rise to her station by accident or even ambition, but because she was in fact the smartest person for the job. “Contaminant?”

	“Contaminant! I saw evidence of something foreign in the loading dock today, I assumed it was just- I don’t know what I thought it was, but, I was also in-”

	“Zenith, what were you doing int he loading dock? I didn’t even get a complaint from them today! If you would just stay in reclamation, like I have asked you to do, on multiple-”

	“No one was in the loading bay today Auntie, I saw them-”

	“The loading crew wasn’t in-”

	“I saw them outside in suits, I thought it was some sort of training exercise, but now I think they might have inhaled spores from the stream!”

	“That’s impossible, the stream diverts kilometers to the north of us, even if it were a stream (and it’s not; you have to stop calling it that, it’s barely a moving puddle) we’re in no danger of-”

	“It’s an underground stream Aunt Meridian, I have told you this a hundred times-”

	“And though it was most certainly not one hundred times, I have explained to you that the geological survey will not confirm your notion that the stream is “peaking” up through a crack.”

	“Yes, you explain to me, over and over again, the results of a survey that has not happened yet.”

	“ZENITH, it doesn’t matter if the survey has not been done, that’s a Stage 2 survey! They won’t pay for that survey for most of your lifetime; I won’t be alive to see the survey, that’s how far off it is!”

	“Which is why-”

	“No! You don’t get to guess! You are guessing Zenith. You have a guess that there is a stream under-”

	“You are also guessing.”

	“I am not, I am employing lifetimes of terraforming history, and the kind of structure you are (wildly) proposing is-”

	Zenith never heard the rest of his aunt’s well-structured argument of how there was no precedent (and therefore no possibility) for the water supply to become contaminated by an alien hallucinogenic plantlife.

	He caught up with Clay.

	But it had been the water. First the loading crew washing the vehicles, and now Clay.

	Barfing.

He’d touched the water.

Clay was gone. Well… sober sentient Clay. This was going to be… someone… a little different.

	“ZENITH!” Oh good, another completely new version of my brother. And this one comes with vomit lip. “AREN’T THEY BEAUTIFUL? WHEN DID WE PLANT THESE?”
	
	Zenith felt alone then, as he watched his brother caressing a pile of dirty wet laundry, that had almost certainly (and hopefully not permanently) rotted and hijacked his mind.

1,182 words.

The second of the two exercises ran longer than I’d expected. This exercise ran shorter than I’d thought it would.

Once the story veered into a possibility for Zenith to figure out not just that something was wrong, but that it was something he’d been anticipating longer than just today, it felt like he needed to run, and to catch up with his crew.

In the original AI draft, Clay was one of the characters who loses his lucidity from the spores. Rune was too. As was the character who was reworked into Zenith’s mother.

I didn’t even realize I’d be having Clay already hallucinating until I felt like I ‘got’ what the ongoing argument between Zenith and Meridian was, and I jumped down and addressed the visual I saw in my head of Clay vomiting, which would mean he too was hallucinating. Then I hopped back up and stitched the two moments together, the end of the fight, interrupted, and Zenith watching Clay lose his sanity, possibly forever, given the unprecedented nature of a terraforming outpost being infected by the host planet’s flora.

It was a lot of fun, writing the back and forth. It needs a lot of work probably, it felt a bit more floaty than it’d need to be, but for a first draft, it’s mostly done the job.

But, it did actually drop the ball on one important job it had to do.

The whole point of the scene was to link the supply shortage to the errors in judgment that would have led to the contaminated water getting in, and going undetected while there was still time.

However, on reflection, all that really happened, was that the hubris was moved from a few unnamed background characters in every department, to the Station Chief herself, Meridian, who, like we talked about in the prep work, is going to have her downfall come from being prepared for ONLY the disasters that have happened to other outposts.

Likely, that prep work corrected my instinct to hoist the blame of of the workforce, and put it where it almost certainly will be able to tell a stronger story: This was Management’s fault.

Wrap Up
5,449 words.

That’s certainly the most fiction draft I’ve ever completed in a day. Draft that I can actually use, that is. (I’ve rushed some NaNoWriMo days with word counts like that, but you won’t ever see the stories because they were so bad as to be useless. Garbage in, garbage out.)

Could I write 5,000+ words a day like this?

Probably not. I’m still not sure if I am a write-fiction-every-day sort of person. And when I do write, it probably won’t be 5,000 every day.

But these exercises did help me experience writing in a fun way that I’ve been working toward for years.

Fiction writing still feels like something, “I’m glad to have done,” more than I am glad while I’m doing it, but this is the first time I could see that changing. This was challenging for me because though I’ve had these theories for some time, I mostly use them to help someone else write their stories, in my capacity as an editor.

It was fun enough that I can see myself trying these techniques again. 

Similarly, it may take some time when you try these exercises out, building fights, and seductions, and negotiations; really thinking about who the characters are, and seeing what they’re like when they have to fight (or dance around a fight) for what they believe in. But see if it improves your word count, see if it makes writing rewarding enough that you keep writing and get all the benefits of being able to sit down and crack out a scene whenever you please.
